Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 14 Worker's Compensation

Revision of title. —

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3, revised this title by repealing and recreating former §§

27-12-101

through 27-12-805 as present §§

27-14-101

through

27-14-804

.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 5, provides: “Notwithstanding provisions of the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act in effect prior to July 1, 1987, and upon receipt of a court order for payment of medical and hospital care expenses of an injured employee and subject to agreement between the division and the hospital or health care provider, the division may partially reduce the amount ordered by the court without prior approval of the court or the employer for purposes of expediting payment. Any reduction in payment shall be reported after the fact to the employer, employee and the clerk of district court. If contested by the employer or employee, no reduction under this section shall be valid unless subsequent court approval is obtained.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 156, § 2 provides: “There is appropriated fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000.00) from the worker's compensation account established by W.S. 27-14-701(a) and forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000.00) from the highway fund for one (1) full-time position which is authorized to the office of administrative hearings. These appropriations shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. The position shall be included in the office's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request and the funding shall be included in the department of employment's and department of transportation's standard biennial budgets.”

Laws 2009, ch. 156, § 3 provides: “There is appropriated twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($27,500.00) from the worker's compensation account established by W.S. 27-14-701(a) and twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500.00) from the highway fund for the cost of investigating the acquisition of a case management system capable of accepting and receiving electronic filings and which includes a time management system. No part of this appropriation shall be expended until after the chief information officer has reviewed the proposed expenditure of these funds and the governor has determined the expenditure is appropriate. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996)

For article, “Administrative Law: Rulemaking and Contested Case Practice in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 685 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Worker's Compensation § 1 et seq.

Presumption or inference that accidental death of employee engaged in occupation of manufacturing or processing arose out of and in course of employment, 47 ALR5th 801.

Workers' compensation as precluding employee's suit against employer for sexual harassment in the workplace, 51 ALR5th 163.

99 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation § 1 et seq.